Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-199
Board of Parole; provision of law not applicable.

The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the Board of Parole or to the exercise of its functions.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 30, p. 3088.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.